Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,934,592 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not  described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Government Ethics
Commission.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 11, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 1